cs: Konfigurace sady strun pro klasickou kytaru: Basové struny (4–6); Celá sada (6 strun); Jedna struna; Diskantové struny (1–3); Jiné
fi: Klassisen kitaran kielisetti: Bassokielet (4–6); Täysi sarja (6 kieltä); Yksittäinen kieli; Diskanttikielet (1–3); Muu
pt-PT: Configuração do conjunto de cordas de guitarra clássica: Cordas graves (4–6); Conjunto completo (6 cordas); Corda individual; Cordas agudas (1–3); Outro
hu: Klasszikus gitárhúrszett konfiguráció: Basszus húrok (4–6); Teljes készlet (6 húr); Különálló húr; Dallamhúrok (1–3); Egyéb
pl: Konfiguracja zestawu strun do gitary klasycznej: Struny basowe (4–6); Pełny zestaw (6 strun); Pojedyncza struna; Struny wiolinowe (1–3); Inna
da: Konfiguration af strengesæt til klassisk guitar: Basstrenge (4-6); Fuldt sæt (6 strenge); Enkelt streng; Diskantstrenge (1-3); Andet
el: Διαμόρφωση σετ χορδών κλασικής κιθάρας: Χορδές μπάσου (4–6); Πλήρες σετ (6 χορδές); Μονή χορδή; Πρίμες χορδές (1–3); Άλλο
pt-BR: Configuração do conjunto de cordas para violão clássico: Cordas graves (4–6); Conjunto completo (6 cordas); Corda avulsa; Cordas agudas (1–3); Outro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia súpravy strún pre klasickú gitaru: Basové struny (4–6); Celá súprava (6 strún); Samostatná struna; Výškové struny (1–3); Iné
sv: Klassisk gitarrsträngskonfiguration: Bassträngar (4–6); Helt set (6 strängar); Lös sträng; Diskantsträngar (1–3); Annan
bg-BG: Конфигурация на комплекта струни за класическа китара: Басови струни (4 – 6); Пълен комплект (6 струни); Единична струна; Високи струни (1 – 3); Друго
ja: クラシックギターストリングセット構造: ベース弦 (4〜6弦); フルセット (6弦); 単弦; トレブル弦 (1〜3弦); その他
vi: Cấu hình bộ dây đàn guitar cổ điển: Dây trầm (4–6); Bộ đầy đủ (6 dây); Dây đơn; Dây cao (1–3); Khác
ro-RO: Configurația setului de corzi ale chitarei clasice: Corzi de bas (4–6); Set complet (6 corzi); O singură coardă; Corzi înalte (1–3); Altele
en: Classical guitar string set configuration: Bass strings (4–6); Full set (6 strings); Single string; Treble strings (1–3); Other
es: Configuración del conjunto de cuerdas de guitarra clásica: Cuerdas graves (4-6); Juego completo (6 cuerdas); Cuerda individual; Cuerdas agudas (1-3); Otro
lt-LT: Klasikinės gitaros stygų rinkinio konfigūracija: Bosinės stygos (4–6); Pilnas komplektas (6 stygos); Viena styga; Aukštų dažnių stygos (1–3); Kita
nl: Klassieke gitaar snarenset configuratie: Bassnaren (4-6); Volledige set (6 snaren); Enkele snaar; Hoge snaren (1-3); Anders
hr-HR: Konfiguracija seta za niz klasične gitare: Bas žice (4 – 6); Puni komplet (6 žica); Pojedinačna žica; Visoke žice (1 – 3); Ostalo
it: Configurazione del set di tasti per chitarra classica: Corde basse (4-6); Muta completa (6 corde); Corda singola; Corde alte (1-3); Altro
ru: Конфигурация комплекта струн для классической гитары: Басовые струны (4–6); Полный комплект (6 струн); Одиночная струна; Дискантовые струны (1–3); Другое
de: Konfiguration des Saitensatzes der klassischen Gitarre: Basssaiten (4–6); Vollständiger Satz (6 Saiten); Einzelsaite; Diskantsaiten (1–3); Sonstige
th: การจัดประเภทชุดสายกีตาร์คลาสสิก: สายเบส (4-6); ชุดเต็ม (6 สาย); สายเดี่ยว; สายเทรเบิล (1-3); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kompleta strun za klasično kitaro: Bas strune (4–6); Celoten komplet (6 strun); Posamezna struna; Visoke strune (1–3); Drugo
ko: 클래식 기타 스트링 세트 구성: 베이스 현(4–6번); 전체 세트(6현); 단일 현; 트레블 현(1–3번); 기타
tr: Klasik gitar teli set konfigürasyonu: Bas telleri (4-6); Tam set (6 tel); Tek tel; Tiz telleri (1-3); Diğer
zh-CN: 古典吉他琴弦套装配置: 低音弦 (4–6); 全套 (6 根弦); 单根弦; 高音弦 (1–3); 其他
zh-TW: 古典吉他弦組配置: 低音弦 (第 4 到 6 弦); 全套 (6 條弦); 單條弦; 高音弦 (第 1 到 3 弦); 其他
fr: Configuration du jeu de cordes de guitare classique: Cordes graves (4 à 6); Jeu complet (6 cordes); Corde à l’unité; Cordes aiguës (1 à 3); Autre
nb: Konfigurasjon av styrkesett for klassisk gitar: Bass-strenger (4–6); Fullt sett (6 strenger); Enkeltstreng; Diskantstrenger (1–3); Annet